Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 7. Transportation Funds.

§ 33.2-1531.
Innovation and Technology Transportation Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Innovation and Technology Transportation Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. The amount allocated to the Fund pursuant to §

33.2-358

and §

33.2-370

and any funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of funding pilot programs and fully developed initiatives pertaining to high-tech infrastructure improvements. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Secretary of Transportation. “High-tech infrastructure improvements” means those projects or programs identified by the Board that reduce congestion, improve mobility, improve safety, provide up-to-date travel data, or improve emergency response. No later than November 30 each year, the Commissioner of Highways shall report in writing to the Governor and General Assembly on the use of moneys in the Fund.

History.

2014, c. 290; 2015, c. 684.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2014, c. 290 enacted
§ 33.1-23.06, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152,
§ 33.1-23.06, has been given effect as this section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “§

33.2-358

and §

33.2-370

” for “subsection C of §

33.2-358

” in the second sentence.

§ 33.2-1532.
Special Structure Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Special Structure Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller.

The amount allocated to the Fund pursuant to §§

33.2-1524

and

33.2-1530

and any funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

Moneys in the Fund shall be allocated by the Board and used solely for the purposes of funding maintenance, rehabilitation, and replacement of special structures, as defined in §

33.2-374

.

History.

2019, cc. 83, 349; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, cc. 83 and
349, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board (the Board) shall undertake a comprehensive review of the current and future condition of pavements and bridges in the Commonwealth. This review shall at a minimum (i) consider current conditions and performance targets of pavements and bridges, (ii) consider current investment strategies of the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund as well as the State of Good Repair Program, (iii) recommend new performance targets for pavements and bridges with sustainable performance over a 20-year period, and (iv) develop an investment strategy for the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund and the State of Good Repair Program to achieve those sustainable performance targets, including a plan to address the funding needs of large and unique bridges and tunnel structures in the Commonwealth. The Board shall report no later than December 1, 2019, to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Transportation, the Joint Commission on Transportation Accountability, the House Committee on Appropriations, and the Senate Committee on Finance.”

Acts
2019, cc. 83 and
349, cl. 3 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board (the Board) shall, after July 1, 2020, and based on the review conducted by the Board pursuant to the second enactment of this act, dedicate a portion of funding from the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund and the State of Good Repair Fund to the Robert O. Norris Bridge and Statewide Special Structure Fund, as created by this act.”

Acts
2019, cc. 83 and
349, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall evaluate the feasibility of using the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 ( §

33.2-1800

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) to design, build, operate, and maintain two bridges to replace the existing Robert O. Norris Bridge on State Route 3 over the Rappahannock River between Lancaster and Middlesex Counties and the existing Downing Bridge on U.S. Route 360 over the Rappahannock River between the Town of Warsaw in Richmond County and the Town of Tappahannock in Essex County.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 13 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, the Commonwealth Transportation Board (i) shall take actions deemed necessary in fiscal years 2021, 2022 and 2023 to ensure appropriate coverage ratios for any outstanding debt backed by the Transportation Trust Fund and (ii) shall ensure funds for modal programs and the highway maintenance and operating fund are at least equal to the amounts provided for the six-year financial plan for the Commonwealth Transportation Fund as in effect on January 1, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and added subsections A, B, and C designations; in subsection B, substituted “33.2-1524” for “33.2-358,

33.2-369

”; and, in subsection C, inserted “allocated to the Board and” preceding “used,” inserted “rehabilitation” following “maintenance,” substituted “special” for “large and unique,” inserted “as defined in §

33.2-374

,” and deleted the former last two sentences.